Nevada, session 83, AB45.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 228.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.205 1. There is hereby created in the Office of the
Attorney General [the Victim Information Notification Everyday
System,] a victim notification system, which consists of a toll-free
telephone number and an Internet website through which victims of
crime and members of the public may register to receive automated
information and notification concerning changes in the custody
status of an offender.
2. The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470 shall serve as the Governance
Committee for the [System.] system.
3. The Governance Committee may adopt policies, protocols
and regulations for the operation and oversight of the [System.]
system.
4. The Attorney General may apply for and accept gifts, grants
and donations for use in carrying out the provisions of this section.
5. To the extent of available funding, each sheriff and chief of
police, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Public
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Safety and the State Board of Parole Commissioners shall cooperate
with the Attorney General to establish and maintain the [System.]
system.
6. The failure of the [System] system to notify a victim of a
crime of a change in the custody status of an offender does not
establish a basis for any cause of action by the victim or any other
party against the State, its political subdivisions, or the agencies,
boards, commissions, departments, officers or employees of the
State or its political subdivisions.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Custody status” means the transfer of the custody of an
offender or the release or escape from custody of an offender.
(b) “Offender” means a person convicted of a crime and
sentenced to imprisonment in a county jail or in the state prison.
(c) “System” means the victim notification system created by
subsection 1.
Sec. 2. NRS 228.427 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.427 “Committee” means the Committee on Domestic
Violence and Sexual Assault appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470.
Sec. 3. NRS 228.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.460 1. The Account for Programs Related to Domestic
Violence and Sexual Assault is hereby created in the State General
Fund. Any fee imposed and collected pursuant to NRS 176.094
must be deposited with the State Controller for credit to the
Account.
2. The Ombudsman for Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual
Assault and Human Trafficking:
(a) Shall administer the Account for Programs Related to
Domestic Violence [;] and Sexual Assault; and
(b) May expend money in the Account only to pay for expenses
related to:
(1) The Committee;
(2) Training law enforcement officers, attorneys and
members of the judicial system about domestic violence [;] and
sexual assault;
(3) Assisting victims of domestic violence and sexual
assault and educating the public concerning domestic violence [;]
and sexual assault; and
(4) Carrying out the duties and functions of his or her office.
3. All claims against the Account for Programs Related to
Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 4. NRS 228.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.470 1. The Committee on Domestic Violence and
Sexual Assault is hereby created. The Committee is comprised of
the Attorney General or a designee of the Attorney General and:
(a) The following members appointed by the Attorney General:
(1) One staff member of a program for victims of domestic
violence;
(2) One staff member of a program for victims of sexual
assault;
(3) One staff member of a program for the treatment of
persons who commit domestic violence;
[(3)] (4) One representative from an office of the district
attorney with experience in prosecuting criminal offenses;
[(4)] (5) One representative from an office of the city
attorney with experience in prosecuting criminal offenses;
[(5)] (6) One law enforcement officer;
[(6)] (7) One provider of mental health care;
[(7) Two survivors]
(8) One survivor of domestic violence;
[(8)] (9) One survivor of sexual assault;
(10) One justice of the peace or municipal judge;
[(9)] (11) One representative from the Office of Court
Administrator; [and
(10)] (12) One medical professional with experience in
working with sexual assault forensic evidence kits; and
(13) Any other person appointed by the Attorney General.
(b) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services, who is appointed by the Administrator of the
Division and who has experience related to the certification of
programs for the treatment of persons who commit domestic
violence.
 Each appointed member serves a term of 2 years. Members may
be reappointed for additional terms of 2 years. At least two members
of the Committee must be residents of a county whose population is
less than 100,000.
2. The Committee shall:
(a) Increase awareness of the existence and unacceptability of
domestic violence and sexual assault in this State;
(b) Review and evaluate existing programs provided to peace
officers for training related to domestic violence and sexual assault
and make recommendations to the Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission regarding such training;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(c) To the extent that money is available, provide financial
support to programs for the prevention of domestic violence and
sexual assault in this State;
(d) Study and review all appropriate issues related to the
administration of the criminal justice system in rural Nevada with
respect to offenses involving domestic violence [,] and sexual
assault, including, without limitation, the availability of counseling
services;
(e) Study issues that relate to domestic violence [,] and sexual
assault, including, without limitation, the intersections between
domestic violence and sexual assault and domestic violence and
human trafficking;
(f) Make recommendations regarding whether a need exists:
(1) For additional sexual assault victims’ advocates and, if
such a need exists, create a plan for how the State can provide
additional sexual assault victims’ advocates to meet such a need;
(2) To provide ongoing evaluation of the implementation of
the rights of survivors pursuant to the Sexual Assault Survivors’
Bill of Rights and, if such a need exists, shall:
(I) Identify the scope and nature of the need; and
(II) Make recommendations on how to best fill such a
need, legislatively or otherwise;
(g) Review the effectiveness of the statewide program to track
sexual assault forensic evidence kits established pursuant to NRS
200.3788; and
[(f)] (h) Submit on or before March 1 of each odd-numbered
year a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the regular session of the Legislature. In preparing the
report, the Committee shall solicit comments and recommendations
from district judges, municipal judges and justices of the peace in
rural Nevada. The report must include, without limitation:
(1) A summary of the work of the Committee and
recommendations for any necessary legislation concerning domestic
violence [;] and sexual assault; and
(2) All comments and recommendations received by the
Committee.
3. The Attorney General or the designee of the Attorney
General is the Chair of the Committee.
4. The Committee shall annually elect a Vice Chair from
among its members.
5. The Committee shall meet regularly at least three times in
each calendar year and may meet at other times upon the call of the
Chair.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
6. At least one meeting in each calendar year must be held at a
location within the Fourth Judicial District, Fifth Judicial District,
Sixth Judicial District, Seventh Judicial District or Eleventh Judicial
District.
7. The Attorney General shall provide the Committee with
such staff as is necessary to carry out the duties of the Committee.
8. While engaged in the business of the Committee, each
member and employee of the Committee is entitled to receive the
per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers
and employees generally.
9. The Committee may adopt regulations necessary to carry out
its duties pursuant to NRS 228.470 to 228.497, inclusive.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Sexual assault forensic evidence kit” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.364.
(b) “Sexual assault victims’ advocate” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 178A.120.
(c) “Survivor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 178A.140.
Sec. 5. NRS 228.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.490 The Committee may apply for and accept gifts, grants,
donations and contributions from any source for the purpose of
carrying out its duties pursuant to NRS 228.470. Any money that
the Committee receives pursuant to this section must be deposited in
and accounted for separately in the Account for Programs Related to
Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault created pursuant to NRS
228.460 for use by the Committee in carrying out its duties.
Sec. 6. NRS 176.094 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.094 In addition to any other fine or penalty, if the court
finds that a person is guilty of committing an act which constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018, the court shall:
1. Enter a finding of fact in the judgment of conviction.
2. Order the person to pay a fee of $35. Any money so
collected must be paid by the clerk of the court to the State
Controller on or before the fifth day of each month for the preceding
month for credit to the Account for Programs Related to Domestic
Violence and Sexual Assault established pursuant to NRS 228.460.
3. Require for the:
(a) First offense within 7 years of any act which constitutes
domestic violence, the person to participate in weekly counseling
sessions of not less than 1 1/2 hours per week for not less than 6
months, but not more than 12 months, at his or her expense, in a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
program for the treatment of persons who commit domestic violence
that has been certified pursuant to NRS 439.258; or
(b) Second offense within 7 years of any act which constitutes
domestic violence, the person to participate in weekly counseling
sessions of not less than 1 1/2 hours per week for 12 months, at his
or her expense, in a program for the treatment of persons who
commit domestic violence that has been certified pursuant to
NRS 439.258.
Sec. 7. NRS 179A.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.075 1. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History is hereby created within the Records,
Communications and Compliance Division of the Department.
2. Each agency of criminal justice and any other agency
dealing with crime shall:
(a) Collect and maintain records, reports and compilations of
statistical data required by the Department; and
(b) Submit the information collected to the Central Repository:
(1) In the manner approved by the Director of the
Department; and
(2) In accordance with the policies, procedures and
definitions of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation.
3. Each agency of criminal justice shall submit the information
relating to records of criminal history that it creates, issues or
collects, and any information in its possession relating to the DNA
profile of a person from whom a biological specimen is obtained
pursuant to NRS 176.09123 or 176.0913, to the Division. The
information must be submitted to the Division:
(a) Through an electronic network;
(b) On a medium of magnetic storage; or
(c) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department,
 within 60 days after the date of the disposition of the case. If an
agency has submitted a record regarding the arrest of a person who
is later determined by the agency not to be the person who
committed the particular crime, the agency shall, immediately upon
making that determination, so notify the Division. The Division
shall delete all references in the Central Repository relating to that
particular arrest.
4. Each state and local law enforcement agency shall submit
Uniform Crime Reports to the Central Repository:
(a) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(b) In accordance with the policies, procedures and definitions
of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation; and
(c) Within the time prescribed by the Director of the
Department.
5. The Division shall, in the manner prescribed by the Director
of the Department:
(a) Collect, maintain and arrange all information submitted to it
relating to:
(1) Records of criminal history; and
(2) The DNA profile of a person from whom a biological
specimen is obtained pursuant to NRS 176.09123 or 176.0913.
(b) When practicable, use a record of the personal identifying
information of a subject as the basis for any records maintained
regarding him or her.
(c) Upon request, provide, in paper or electronic form, the
information that is contained in the Central Repository to the
Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault appointed
pursuant to NRS 228.470 when, pursuant to NRS 228.495, the
Committee is reviewing the death of the victim of a crime that
constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018.
6. The Division may:
(a) Disseminate any information which is contained in the
Central Repository to any other agency of criminal justice;
(b) Enter into cooperative agreements with repositories of the
United States and other states to facilitate exchanges of information
that may be disseminated pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(c) Request of and receive from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation information on the background and personal history of
any person whose record of fingerprints or other biometric identifier
the Central Repository submits to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and:
(1) Who has applied to any agency of the State of Nevada or
any political subdivision thereof for a license which it has the power
to grant or deny;
(2) With whom any agency of the State of Nevada or any
political subdivision thereof intends to enter into a relationship of
employment or a contract for personal services;
(3) Who has applied to any agency of the State of Nevada or
any political subdivision thereof to attend an academy for training
peace officers approved by the Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(4) For whom such information is required or authorized to
be obtained pursuant to NRS 62B.270, 62G.223, 62G.353, 424.031,
432A.170, 432B.198, 433B.183, 449.123 and 449.4329; or
(5) About whom any agency of the State of Nevada or any
political subdivision thereof is authorized by law to have accurate
personal information for the protection of the agency or the persons
within its jurisdiction.
7. To request and receive information from the Federal Bureau
of Investigation concerning a person pursuant to subsection 6, the
Central Repository must receive:
(a) The person’s complete set of fingerprints for the purposes of:
(1) Booking the person into a city or county jail or detention
facility;
(2) Employment;
(3) Contractual services; or
(4) Services related to occupational licensing;
(b) One or more of the person’s fingerprints for the purposes of
mobile identification by an agency of criminal justice; or
(c) Any other biometric identifier of the person as it may require
for the purposes of:
(1) Arrest; or
(2) Criminal investigation,
 from the agency of criminal justice or agency of the State of
Nevada or any political subdivision thereof and submit the received
data to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.
8. The Central Repository shall:
(a) Collect and maintain records, reports and compilations of
statistical data submitted by any agency pursuant to subsection 2.
(b) Tabulate and analyze all records, reports and compilations of
statistical data received pursuant to this section.
(c) Disseminate to federal agencies engaged in the collection of
statistical data relating to crime information which is contained in
the Central Repository.
(d) Investigate the criminal history of any person who:
(1) Has applied to the Superintendent of Public Instruction
for the issuance or renewal of a license;
(2) Has applied to a county school district, charter school or
private school for employment or to serve as a volunteer; or
(3) Is employed by or volunteers for a county school district,
charter school or private school,
 and immediately notify the superintendent of each county school
district, the governing body of each charter school and the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the administrator of each
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
private school, as appropriate, if the investigation of the Central
Repository indicates that the person has been convicted of a
violation of NRS 200.508, 201.230, 453.3385, 453.3387 or 453.339,
or convicted of a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude.
(e) Upon discovery, immediately notify the superintendent of
each county school district, the governing body of each charter
school or the administrator of each private school, as appropriate, by
providing the superintendent, governing body or administrator with
a list of all persons:
(1) Investigated pursuant to paragraph (d); or
(2) Employed by or volunteering for a county school district,
charter school or private school whose fingerprints were sent
previously to the Central Repository for investigation,
 who the Central Repository’s records indicate have been
convicted of a violation of NRS 200.508, 201.230, 453.3385,
453.3387 or 453.339, or convicted of a felony or any offense
involving moral turpitude since the Central Repository’s initial
investigation. The superintendent of each county school district, the
governing body of a charter school or the administrator of each
private school, as applicable, shall determine whether further
investigation or action by the district, charter school or private
school, as applicable, is appropriate.
(f) Investigate the criminal history of each person who submits
one or more fingerprints or other biometric identifier or has such
data submitted pursuant to NRS 62B.270, 62G.223, 62G.353,
424.031, 432A.170, 432B.198, 433B.183, 449.122, 449.123 or
449.4329.
(g) Provide an electronic means to access on the Central
Repository’s Internet website statistical data relating to crime.
(h) Provide an electronic means to access on the Central
Repository’s Internet website statistical data about domestic
violence in this State.
(i) Identify and review the collection and processing of
statistical data relating to criminal justice by any agency identified
in subsection 2 and make recommendations for any necessary
changes in the manner of collecting and processing statistical data
by any such agency.
(j) Adopt regulations governing biometric identifiers and the
information and data derived from biometric identifiers, including,
without limitation:
(1) Their collection, use, safeguarding, handling, retention,
storage, dissemination and destruction; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(2) The methods by which a person may request the removal
of his or her biometric identifiers from the Central Repository and
any other agency where his or her biometric identifiers have been
stored.
9. The Central Repository may:
(a) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department,
disseminate compilations of statistical data and publish statistical
reports relating to crime.
(b) Charge a reasonable fee for any publication or special report
it distributes relating to data collected pursuant to this section. The
Central Repository may not collect such a fee from an agency of
criminal justice or any other agency dealing with crime which is
required to submit information pursuant to subsection 2. All money
collected pursuant to this paragraph must be used to pay for the cost
of operating the Central Repository or for any other purpose
authorized by the Legislature, and any balance of the money
remaining at the end of a fiscal year reverts to the State General
Fund.
(c) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department,
use electronic means to receive and disseminate information
contained in the Central Repository that it is authorized to
disseminate pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Mobile identification” means the collection, storage,
transmission, reception, search, access or processing of a biometric
identifier using a handheld device.
(b) “Personal identifying information” means any information
designed, commonly used or capable of being used, alone or in
conjunction with any other information, to identify a person,
including, without limitation:
(1) The name, driver’s license number, social security
number, date of birth and photograph or computer-generated image
of a person; and
(2) A biometric identifier of a person.
(c) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
Sec. 8. NRS 179A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.100 1. The following records of criminal history may
be disseminated by an agency of criminal justice without any
restriction pursuant to this chapter:
(a) Any which reflect records of conviction only; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(b) Any which pertain to an incident for which a person is
currently within the system of criminal justice, including parole or
probation.
2. Without any restriction pursuant to this chapter, a record of
criminal history or the absence of such a record may be:
(a) Disclosed among agencies which maintain a system for the
mutual exchange of criminal records.
(b) Furnished by one agency to another to administer the system
of criminal justice, including the furnishing of information by a
police department to a district attorney.
(c) Reported to the Central Repository.
3. An agency of criminal justice shall disseminate to a
prospective employer, upon request, records of criminal history
concerning a prospective employee or volunteer which are the result
of a name-based inquiry and which:
(a) Reflect convictions only; or
(b) Pertain to an incident for which the prospective employee or
volunteer is currently within the system of criminal justice,
including parole or probation.
4. Records of criminal history must be disseminated by an
agency of criminal justice, upon request, to the following persons or
governmental entities:
(a) The person who is the subject of the record of criminal
history for the purposes of NRS 179A.150.
(b) The person who is the subject of the record of criminal
history when the subject is a party in a judicial, administrative,
licensing, disciplinary or other proceeding to which the information
is relevant.
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(d) The State Board of Nursing.
(e) The Private Investigator’s Licensing Board to investigate an
applicant for a license.
(f) A public administrator or a person employed or contracted
with pursuant to NRS 253.125, as applicable, to carry out the duties
as prescribed in chapter 253 of NRS.
(g) A public guardian to investigate a protected person or
proposed protected person or persons who may have knowledge of
assets belonging to a protected person or proposed protected person.
(h) Any agency of criminal justice of the United States or of
another state or the District of Columbia.
(i) Any public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Public
Utilities Commission of Nevada when the information is necessary
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
to conduct a security investigation of an employee or prospective
employee or to protect the public health, safety or welfare.
(j) Persons and agencies authorized by statute, ordinance,
executive order, court rule, court decision or court order as
construed by appropriate state or local officers or agencies.
(k) Any person or governmental entity which has entered into a
contract to provide services to an agency of criminal justice relating
to the administration of criminal justice, if authorized by the
contract, and if the contract also specifies that the information will
be used only for stated purposes and that it will be otherwise
confidential in accordance with state and federal law and regulation.
(l) Any reporter or editorial employee who is employed or
affiliated with a newspaper, press association or commercially
operated, federally licensed radio or television station who requests
a record of a named person or aggregate information for statistical
purposes, excluding any personal identifying information, in a
professional capacity for communication to the public.
(m) Prospective employers if the person who is the subject of
the information has given written consent to the release of that
information by the agency which maintains it.
(n) For the express purpose of research, evaluative or statistical
programs pursuant to an agreement with an agency of criminal
justice.
(o) An agency which provides child welfare services, as defined
in NRS 432B.030.
(p) The Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services or its designated
representative, as needed to ensure the safety of investigators and
caseworkers.
(q) The Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services or its designated
representative, as needed to ensure the safety of investigators and
caseworkers.
(r) An agency of this or any other state or the Federal
Government that is conducting activities pursuant to Part D of
Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the Social Security Act,
42 U.S.C. §§ 651 et seq.
(s) The Commissioner of Insurance.
(t) The Board of Medical Examiners.
(u) The State Board of Osteopathic Medicine.
(v) The Board of Massage Therapy and its Executive Director.
(w) The Board of Examiners for Social Workers.
(x) The State Board of Cosmetology and its Executive Director.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(y) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470 when, pursuant to NRS
228.495, the Committee is reviewing the death of the victim of a
crime that constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018.
(z) A county coroner or medical examiner, as needed to conduct
an investigation of the death of a person.
5. Agencies of criminal justice in this State which receive
information from sources outside this State concerning transactions
involving criminal justice which occur outside Nevada shall treat the
information as confidentially as is required by the provisions of this
chapter.
Sec. 9. NRS 200.3788 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.3788 1. A statewide program to track sexual assault
forensic evidence kits must be established in this State. The
Attorney General shall, pursuant to the recommendation of the
[Sexual Assault Kit Working Group,] Committee on Domestic
Violence and Sexual Assault appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470,
designate a department or division of the Executive Department of
State Government to establish the program. The designated
department or division may contract with any appropriate public or
private agency, organization or institution to carry out the provisions
of this section.
2. The program to track sexual assault forensic evidence kits
must:
(a) Track the location and status of sexual assault forensic
evidence kits, including, without limitation, the initial forensic
medical examination, receipt by a law enforcement agency and
receipt and genetic marker analysis at a forensic laboratory.
(b) Allow providers of health care who perform forensic medical
examinations, law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, forensic
laboratories and any other entities having sexual assault forensic
evidence kits in their custody to track the status and location of
sexual assault forensic evidence kits.
(c) Allow a victim of sexual assault to anonymously track or
receive, by telephone or on an Internet website, updates regarding
the status and location of his or her sexual assault forensic evidence
kit.
3. The department or division designated pursuant to
subsection 1 shall, on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year,
submit to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
the Judiciary and post on the Internet website maintained by the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
department or division a report concerning the statewide program to
track sexual assault forensic evidence kits. The report must include:
(a) The number of sexual assault forensic evidence kits in the
program in each county.
(b) The number of sexual assault forensic evidence kits for
which genetic marker analysis has been completed for each county
for the last 6 months.
(c) The number of sexual assault forensic evidence kits added to
the program in each county during the last 6 months.
(d) The number of sexual assault forensic evidence kits for
which genetic marker analysis has been requested but not completed
for each county.
(e) For this State as a whole and each county, the average and
median time between a forensic medical examination and receipt of
a sexual assault forensic evidence kit by a forensic laboratory for
genetic marker analysis, overall and for the last 6 months.
(f) For this State as a whole and each county, the average and
median time between receipt of a sexual assault forensic evidence
kit by a forensic laboratory and genetic marker analysis, overall and
for the last 6 months.
(g) The number of sexual assault forensic evidence kits in each
county awaiting genetic marker analysis for more than 1 year and 6
months after forensic medical examination.
4. Each law enforcement agency, prosecutor, forensic
laboratory and provider of health care who performs forensic
medical examinations in this State shall participate in the statewide
program to track sexual assault forensic evidence kits for the
purpose of tracking the status of any sexual assault forensic
evidence kits in the custody of the agency, prosecutor, laboratory or
provider, or a third party under contract with such agency,
prosecutor, laboratory or provider.
5. Any agency or person who acts pursuant to this section in
good faith and without gross negligence is immune from civil
liability for those acts.
6. The department or division designated pursuant to
subsection 1 may apply for and accept any gift, donation, bequest,
grant or other source of money to carry out the provisions of this
section.
[7. As used in this section, “Sexual Assault Kit Working
Group” means the statewide working group led by the Office of the
Attorney General to create policies and procedures to address the
backlog of sexual assault forensic evidence kits that have not been
tested.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 10. NRS 217.475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
217.475 1. A court or an agency of a local government may
organize or sponsor one or more multidisciplinary teams to review
the death of the victim of a crime that constitutes domestic violence
pursuant to NRS 33.018.
2. If a multidisciplinary team is organized or sponsored
pursuant to subsection 1, the court or agency shall review the death
of a victim upon receiving a written request from a person related to
the victim within the third degree of consanguinity, if the request is
received by the court or agency within 1 year after the date of death
of the victim.
3. Members of a team that is organized or sponsored pursuant
to subsection 1 serve at the pleasure of the court or agency that
organizes or sponsors the team and must include, without limitation,
representatives of organizations concerned with law enforcement,
issues related to physical or mental health, or the prevention of
domestic violence and assistance to victims of domestic violence.
4. Each organization represented on such a team may share
with other members of the team information in its possession
concerning the victim who is the subject of the review or any person
who was in contact with the victim and any other information
deemed by the organization to be pertinent to the review. Any
information shared by an organization with other members of a team
is confidential.
5. A team organized or sponsored pursuant to this section may,
upon request, provide a report concerning its review to a person
related to the victim within the third degree of consanguinity.
6. Before establishing a team to review the death of a victim
pursuant to this section, a court or an agency shall adopt a written
protocol describing its objectives and the structure of the team.
7. A team organized or sponsored pursuant to this section may
request any person, agency or organization that is in possession of
information or records concerning the victim who is the subject of
the review or any person who was in contact with the victim to
provide the team with any information or records that are relevant to
the team’s review. Any information or records provided to a team
pursuant to this subsection are confidential.
8. A team organized or sponsored pursuant to this section may,
if appropriate, meet with any person, agency or organization that the
team believes may have information relevant to the review
conducted by the team, including, without limitation:
(a) A multidisciplinary team to review the death of a child
organized pursuant to NRS 432B.405;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(b) A multidisciplinary team to oversee the review of the death
of a child organized pursuant to NRS 432B.4075; or
(c) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470.
9. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, each member
of a team organized or sponsored pursuant to this section is immune
from civil or criminal liability for an activity related to the review of
the death of a victim.
10. Each member of a team organized or sponsored pursuant to
this section who discloses any confidential information concerning
the death of a child is personally liable for a civil penalty of not
more than $500.
11. The Attorney General:
(a) May bring an action to recover a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to subsection 10 against a member of a team organized or
sponsored pursuant to this section; and
(b) Shall deposit any money received from the civil penalty with
the State Treasurer for credit to the State General Fund.
12. The results of the review of the death of a victim pursuant
to this section are not admissible in any civil action or proceeding.
Sec. 11. NRS 427A.940 is hereby amended to read as follows:
427A.940 1. The Committee is entitled to access to:
(a) All final investigative information of law enforcement
agencies regarding a death that may have been caused by or related
to adult maltreatment or other incident of adult maltreatment being
investigated by the Committee for which the investigation by the
law enforcement agency has been closed;
(b) Any autopsy and coroner’s investigative records relating to a
death of an older person or a vulnerable person that may have been
caused by or related to adult maltreatment;
(c) Any medical or mental health records of a decedent or other
victim of adult maltreatment;
(d) Any records of the Division or any other agency which has
provided services to a decedent or other victim of adult
maltreatment; and
(e) Any other records determined by the Committee to be
necessary to perform its duties, except for records of a law
enforcement agency not described in paragraph (a).
2. The Committee may, if appropriate, meet and share
information with:
(a) A multidisciplinary team to review the death of the victim of
a crime that constitutes domestic violence organized or sponsored
pursuant to NRS 217.475;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(b) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470; or
(c) The Unit for the Investigation and Prosecution of Crimes
Against Older Persons or Vulnerable Persons in the Office of the
Attorney General created by NRS 228.265.
3. The Committee may petition the district court for the
issuance of, and the district court may issue, a subpoena to compel
the production of any books, records or papers described in
subsection 1 that are relevant to the cause of any death or incident of
adult maltreatment being investigated by the Committee. Except as
otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, any books, records or papers
received by the Committee pursuant to a subpoena issued pursuant
to this subsection shall be deemed confidential and privileged and
not subject to disclosure.
4. The Committee may use data collected concerning a death
that is known or suspected to have been caused by or be related to
adult maltreatment for the purpose of research or to prevent future
adult maltreatment if the data is aggregated and does not allow for
the identification of any person.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section, information
acquired by, and the records of, the Committee are confidential, are
not public records, must not be disclosed and are not subject to
subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil or
criminal proceeding. The disclosure of information or records to the
Committee does not make such information or records confidential
with respect to the person or entity that disclosed the records if the
information or records are not otherwise confidential.
6. The meetings of the Committee are closed to the public.
Sec. 12. NRS 432B.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.290 1. Information maintained by an agency which
provides child welfare services must be maintained by the agency
which provides child welfare services as required by federal law as a
condition of the allocation of federal money to this State.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section and NRS
432B.165, 432B.175 and 432B.513, information maintained by an
agency which provides child welfare services may, at the discretion
of the agency which provides child welfare services, be made
available only to:
(a) A physician, if the physician has before him or her a child
who the physician has reasonable cause to believe has been abused
or neglected;
(b) A person authorized to place a child in protective custody, if
the person has before him or her a child who the person has
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
reasonable cause to believe has been abused or neglected and the
person requires the information to determine whether to place the
child in protective custody;
(c) An agency, including, without limitation, an agency in
another jurisdiction, responsible for or authorized to undertake the
care, treatment or supervision of:
(1) The child; or
(2) The person responsible for the welfare of the child;
(d) A district attorney or other law enforcement officer who
requires the information in connection with an investigation or
prosecution of the abuse or neglect of a child;
(e) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (f), a court other
than a juvenile court, for in camera inspection only, unless the court
determines that public disclosure of the information is necessary for
the determination of an issue before it;
(f) A court, as defined in NRS 159A.015, to determine whether
a guardian or successor guardian of a child should be appointed
pursuant to chapter 159A of NRS or NRS 432B.466 to 432B.468,
inclusive;
(g) A person engaged in bona fide research or an audit, but
information identifying the subjects of a report must not be made
available to the person;
(h) The attorney and the guardian ad litem of the child, if the
information is reasonably necessary to promote the safety,
permanency and well-being of the child;
(i) A person who files or intends to file a petition for the
appointment of a guardian or successor guardian of a child pursuant
to chapter 159A of NRS or NRS 432B.466 to 432B.468, inclusive,
if the identity of the person responsible for reporting the abuse or
neglect of the child to a public agency is kept confidential and the
information is reasonably necessary to promote the safety,
permanency and well-being of the child;
(j) The proposed guardian or proposed successor guardian of a
child over whom a guardianship is sought pursuant to chapter 159A
of NRS or NRS 432B.466 to 432B.468, inclusive, if the identity of
the person responsible for reporting the abuse or neglect of the child
to a public agency is kept confidential and the information is
reasonably necessary to promote the safety, permanency and well-
being of the child;
(k) A grand jury upon its determination that access to these
records and the information is necessary in the conduct of its official
business;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(l) A federal, state or local governmental entity, or an agency of
such an entity, or a juvenile court, that needs access to the
information to carry out its legal responsibilities to protect children
from abuse and neglect;
(m) A person or an organization that has entered into a written
agreement with an agency which provides child welfare services to
provide assessments or services and that has been trained to make
such assessments or provide such services;
(n) A team organized pursuant to NRS 432B.350 for the
protection of a child;
(o) A team organized pursuant to NRS 432B.405 to review the
death of a child;
(p) A multidisciplinary team, as defined in NRS 432B.4014;
(q) A parent or legal guardian of the child and an attorney of a
parent or legal guardian of the child, including, without limitation,
the parent or guardian of a child over whom a guardianship is
sought pursuant to chapter 159A of NRS or NRS 432B.466 to
432B.468, inclusive, if the identity of the person responsible for
reporting the abuse or neglect of the child to a public agency is kept
confidential and the information is reasonably necessary to promote
the safety, permanency and well-being of the child and is limited to
information concerning that parent or guardian;
(r) The child over whom a guardianship is sought pursuant to
chapter 159A of NRS or NRS 432B.466 to 432B.468, inclusive, if:
(1) The child is 14 years of age or older; and
(2) The identity of the person responsible for reporting the
abuse or neglect of the child to a public agency is kept confidential
and the information is reasonably necessary to promote the safety,
permanency and well-being of the child;
(s) The persons or agent of the persons who are the subject of a
report, if the information is reasonably necessary to promote the
safety, permanency and well-being of the child and is limited to
information concerning those persons;
(t) An agency that is authorized by law to license foster homes
or facilities for children or to investigate persons applying for
approval to adopt a child, if the agency has before it an application
for that license or is investigating an applicant to adopt a child;
(u) Upon written consent of the parent, any officer of this State
or a city or county thereof or Legislator authorized by the agency or
department having jurisdiction or by the Legislature, acting within
its jurisdiction, to investigate the activities or programs of an agency
which provides child welfare services if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(1) The identity of the person making the report is kept
confidential; and
(2) The officer, Legislator or a member of the family of the
officer or Legislator is not the person alleged to have committed the
abuse or neglect;
(v) The Division of Parole and Probation of the Department of
Public Safety for use pursuant to NRS 176.135 in making a
presentence investigation and report to the district court or pursuant
to NRS 176.151 in making a general investigation and report;
(w) Any person who is required pursuant to NRS 432B.220 to
make a report to an agency which provides child welfare services or
to a law enforcement agency;
(x) A local advisory board to expedite proceedings for the
placement of children created pursuant to NRS 432B.604;
(y) The panel established pursuant to NRS 432B.396 to evaluate
agencies which provide child welfare services;
(z) An employer in accordance with subsection 3 of
NRS 432.100;
(aa) A team organized or sponsored pursuant to NRS 217.475 or
228.495 to review the death of the victim of a crime that constitutes
domestic violence;
(bb) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470; or
(cc) The Committee to Review Suicide Fatalities created by
NRS 439.5104.
3. An agency investigating a report of the abuse or neglect of a
child shall, upon request, provide to a person named in the report as
allegedly causing the abuse or neglect of the child:
(a) A copy of:
(1) Any statement made in writing to an investigator for the
agency by the person named in the report as allegedly causing the
abuse or neglect of the child; or
(2) Any recording made by the agency of any statement
made orally to an investigator for the agency by the person named in
the report as allegedly causing the abuse or neglect of the child; or
(b) A written summary of the allegations made against the
person who is named in the report as allegedly causing the abuse or
neglect of the child. The summary must not identify the person
responsible for reporting the alleged abuse or neglect or any
collateral sources and reporting parties.
4. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 6, before
releasing any information maintained by an agency which provides
child welfare services pursuant to this section, an agency which
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
provides child welfare services shall take whatever precautions it
determines are reasonably necessary to protect the identity and
safety of any person who reports child abuse or neglect and to
protect any other person if the agency which provides child welfare
services reasonably believes that disclosure of the information
would cause a specific and material harm to an investigation of the
alleged abuse or neglect of a child or the life or safety of any person.
5. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
require an agency which provides child welfare services to disclose
information maintained by the agency which provides child welfare
services if, after consultation with the attorney who represents the
agency, the agency determines that such disclosure would cause a
specific and material harm to a criminal investigation.
6. A person who is the subject of a report of child abuse or
neglect made pursuant to this chapter that is assigned a disposition
other than substantiated pursuant to NRS 432B.305 and who
believes that the report was made in bad faith or with malicious
intent may petition a district court to order the agency which
provides child welfare services to release information maintained by
the agency which provides child welfare services. The petition must
specifically set forth the reasons supporting the belief that the report
was made in bad faith or with malicious intent. The petitioner shall
provide notice to the agency which provides child welfare services
so that the agency may participate in the action through its counsel.
The district court shall review the information which the petitioner
requests to be released and the petitioner shall be allowed to present
evidence in support of the petition. If the court determines that there
is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the report was made in
bad faith or with malicious intent and that the disclosure of the
identity of the person who made the report would not be likely to
endanger the life or safety of the person who made the report, the
court shall provide a copy of the information to the petitioner and
the original information is subject to discovery in a subsequent civil
action regarding the making of the report.
7. If an agency which provides child welfare services receives
any information that is deemed confidential by law, the agency
which provides child welfare services shall maintain the
confidentiality of the information as prescribed by applicable law.
8. Pursuant to this section, a person may authorize the release
of information maintained by an agency which provides child
welfare services about himself or herself, but may not waive the
confidentiality of such information concerning any other person.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
9. An agency which provides child welfare services may
provide a summary of the outcome of an investigation of the alleged
abuse or neglect of a child to the person who reported the suspected
abuse or neglect.
10. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person
who is provided with information maintained by an agency which
provides child welfare services and who further disseminates the
information or makes the information public is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. This subsection does not apply to:
(a) A district attorney or other law enforcement officer who uses
the information solely for the purpose of initiating legal
proceedings;
(b) An employee of the Division of Parole and Probation of the
Department of Public Safety making a presentence investigation and
report to the district court pursuant to NRS 176.135 or making a
general investigation and report pursuant to NRS 176.151; or
(c) An employee of a juvenile justice agency who provides the
information to the juvenile court.
11. An agency which provides child welfare services may
charge a fee for processing costs reasonably necessary to prepare
information maintained by the agency which provides child welfare
services for release pursuant to this section.
12. An agency which provides child welfare services shall
adopt rules, policies or regulations to carry out the provisions of this
section.
13. As used in this section, “juvenile justice agency” means the
Youth Parole Bureau or a director of juvenile services.
Sec. 13. NRS 432B.407 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.407 1. A multidisciplinary team to review the death of
a child is entitled to access to:
(a) All investigative information of law enforcement agencies
regarding the death;
(b) Any autopsy and coroner’s investigative records relating to
the death;
(c) Any medical or mental health records of the child; and
(d) Any records of social and rehabilitative services or of any
other social service agency which has provided services to the child
or the child’s family.
2. Each organization represented on a multidisciplinary team to
review the death of a child shall share with other members of the
team information in its possession concerning the child who is the
subject of the review, any siblings of the child, any person who was
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
responsible for the welfare of the child and any other information
deemed by the organization to be pertinent to the review.
3. A multidisciplinary team to review the death of a child may,
if appropriate, meet and share information with:
(a) A multidisciplinary team to review the death of the victim of
a crime that constitutes domestic violence organized or sponsored
pursuant to NRS 217.475; or
(b) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470.
4. A multidisciplinary team to review the death of a child may
petition the district court for the issuance of, and the district court
may issue, a subpoena to compel the production of any books,
records or papers relevant to the cause of any death being
investigated by the team. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
239.0115, any books, records or papers received by the team
pursuant to the subpoena shall be deemed confidential and
privileged and not subject to disclosure.
5. A multidisciplinary team to review the death of a child may
use data collected concerning the death of a child for the purpose of
research or to prevent future deaths of children if the data is
aggregated and does not allow for the identification of any person.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, information
acquired by, and the records of, a multidisciplinary team to review
the death of a child are confidential, must not be disclosed, and are
not subject to subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence in
any civil or criminal proceeding.
Sec. 14. NRS 439.5106 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.5106 1. The Committee:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, shall adopt a
written protocol setting forth the suicide fatalities in this State which
must be reported to the Committee and screened for review by the
Committee and the suicide fatalities in this State which the
Committee may reject for review. The Committee shall not review
any case in which litigation is pending.
(b) May review any accidental death which the Committee
determines may assist in suicide prevention efforts in this State.
(c) May establish differing levels of review, including, without
limitation, a comprehensive or limited review depending upon the
nature of the incident or the purpose of the review.
2. The Committee shall obtain and use any data or other
information to:
(a) Review suicide fatalities in this State to determine trends,
risk factors and strategies for prevention;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(b) Determine and prepare reports concerning trends and
patterns of suicide fatalities in this State;
(c) Identify and evaluate the prevalence of risk factors for
preventable suicide fatalities in this State;
(d) Evaluate and prepare reports concerning high-risk factors,
current practices, lapses in systematic responses and barriers to the
safety and well-being of persons who are at risk of suicide in this
State; and
(e) Recommend any improvement in sources of information
relating to investigating reported suicide fatalities and preventing
suicide in this State.
3. In conducting a review of a suicide fatality in this State, the
Committee shall, to the greatest extent practicable, consult and
cooperate with:
(a) The Coordinator of the Statewide Program for Suicide
Prevention employed pursuant to NRS 439.511;
(b) Each trainer for suicide prevention employed pursuant to
NRS 439.513;
(c) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470; and
(d) A multidisciplinary team:
(1) To review the death of the victim of a crime that
constitutes domestic violence organized or sponsored pursuant to
NRS 217.475;
(2) To review the death of a child organized pursuant to NRS
432B.405; and
(3) To oversee the review of the death of a child organized
pursuant to NRS 432B.4075.
4. Any review conducted by the Committee pursuant to NRS
439.5102 to 439.5108, inclusive, is separate from, independent of
and in addition to any investigation or review which is required or
authorized by law to be conducted, including, without limitation,
any investigation conducted by a coroner or coroner’s deputy
pursuant to NRS 259.050.
5. To conduct a review pursuant to NRS 439.5102 to 439.5108,
inclusive, the Committee may access information, including,
without limitation:
(a) Any investigative information obtained by a law
enforcement agency relating to a death;
(b) Any records from an autopsy or an investigation conducted
by a coroner or coroner’s deputy relating to a death;
(c) Any medical or mental health records of a decedent;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(d) Any records relating to social or rehabilitative services
provided to a decedent; and
(e) Any records of a social services agency which has provided
services to a decedent.
Sec. 15. NRS 440.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.170 1. All certificates in the custody of the State
Registrar are open to inspection subject to the provisions of this
chapter. It is unlawful for any employee of the State to disclose data
contained in vital statistics, except as authorized by this chapter or
by the Board.
2. Information in vital statistics indicating that a birth occurred
out of wedlock must not be disclosed except upon order of a court of
competent jurisdiction.
3. The Board:
(a) Shall allow the use of data contained in vital statistics to
carry out the provisions of NRS 442.300 to 442.330, inclusive;
(b) Shall allow the use of certificates of death by a
multidisciplinary team:
(1) To review the death of the victim of a crime that
constitutes domestic violence organized or sponsored pursuant to
NRS 217.475; and
(2) To review the death of a child established pursuant to
NRS 432B.405 and 432B.406;
(c) Shall allow the use of certificates of death by the:
(1) Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470; and
(2) Committee to Review Suicide Fatalities created by NRS
439.5104; and
(d) May allow the use of data contained in vital statistics for
other research purposes, but without identifying the persons to
whom the records relate.
Sec. 16. NRS 442.774 is hereby amended to read as follows:
442.774 1. The Committee is entitled to access to:
(a) All final investigative information of law enforcement
agencies regarding a maternal death or incident of severe maternal
morbidity being investigated by the Committee for which the
investigation by the law enforcement agency has been closed;
(b) Any autopsy and coroner’s investigative records relating to
the death or incident;
(c) Any medical or mental health records of the person who
gave birth to a child;
(d) Any records of social and rehabilitative services or of any
other social service agency which has provided services to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
person who gave birth to a child or the family of the person who
gave birth to a child;
(e) The system for the reporting of information on cancer and
other neoplasms established pursuant to NRS 457.230; and
(f) Any other records determined by the Committee to be
necessary to perform its duties, except for records of a law
enforcement agency not described in paragraph (a).
2. The Committee may, if appropriate, meet and share
information with:
(a) A multidisciplinary team to review the death of the victim of
a crime that constitutes domestic violence organized or sponsored
pursuant to NRS 217.475; or
(b) The Committee on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault
appointed pursuant to NRS 228.470.
3. The Committee may petition the district court for the
issuance of, and the district court may issue, a subpoena to compel
the production of any books, records or papers described in
subsection 1 that are relevant to the cause of any death or incident of
severe maternal morbidity being investigated by the Committee.
Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, any books, records
or papers received by the Committee pursuant to the subpoena shall
be deemed confidential and privileged and not subject to disclosure.
4. The Committee may use data collected concerning a
maternal death or incident of severe maternal morbidity for the
purpose of research or to prevent future maternal mortality and
severe maternal morbidity if the data is aggregated and does not
allow for the identification of any person.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section, information
acquired by, and the records of, the Committee are confidential, are
not public records, must not be disclosed, and are not subject to
subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil or
criminal proceeding.
6. The meetings of the Committee are closed to the public.
Sec. 17. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provisions of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 18. 1. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
2. Any administrative regulations adopted by an officer or an
agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency remain in force until amended by the
officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption of the
regulations has been transferred.
3. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
4. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)